src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Traveller Norwegian verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Traveller Romani language verbs inflect in tense and participle.
!! The lexica v1, v2, v3 are taken from the grammar.
!! The distinction lies in the past tense suffix (null for v1 vs. dde for v2).


LEXICON vaux
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds the tag  **++V+Ind**, this lexicon is probably not needed
+V+Inf: # ;


LEXICON v1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Prs:%>r # ;
+V+Prt: # ;
+V+PrfPrt: # ;
+V+PrsPrt:%>nes # ;
+V+Imp: # ;

LEXICON v2
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Prs:%>r # ;
+V+Prt:%>dde # ;
+V+PrfPrt:%>dd # ;
+V+PrsPrt:enes # ;
+V+Imp: # ;

LEXICON v3
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Prs: # ;
+V+Prt: # ;
+V+PrfPrt: # ;
+V+PrsPrt:%>enes # ;
+V+Imp: # ;
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
